Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB650.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1016 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1016. Right to Enter and Inspect.--* * *(c.1) All child care centers and family child care homes shall install and maintain door safety guards that meet or exceed requirements established by the department by regulation for the purpose of minimizing risk of harm or injury to children.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617